Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1.1. Elective Share of Surviving Spouse of Decedent Dying on or after January 1, 2017.

§ 64.2-308.1.
Applicability; definitions.

The provisions of this article shall apply to determining the elective share of a surviving spouse for decedents dying on or after January 1, 2017.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Decedent’s non-probate transfers to others” means the amounts that are included in the augmented estate under §

64.2-308.6

.“Fractional interest in property held in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship,” whether the fractional interest is unilaterally severable or not, means the fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which, if the decedent was a joint tenant, is one plus the number of joint tenants who survive the decedent and which, if the decedent was not a joint tenant, is the number of joint tenants.“Marriage,” as it relates to a transfer by the decedent during marriage, means any marriage of the decedent to the decedent’s surviving spouse.“Non-adverse party” means a person who does not have a substantial beneficial interest in the trust or other property arrangement that would be adversely affected by the exercise or non-exercise of the power that he possesses respecting the trust or other property arrangement. A person having a general power of appointment over property is deemed to have a beneficial interest in the property.“Power” or “power of appointment” includes a power to designate the beneficiary of a beneficiary designation.“Presently exercisable general power of appointment” means a power of appointment under which, at the time in question, the decedent, whether or not he then had the capacity to exercise the power, held a power to create a present or future interest in himself, his creditors, his estate, or creditors of his estate, and includes a power to revoke or invade the principal of a trust or other property arrangement.“Property” includes values subject to a beneficiary designation.“Right to income” includes a right to payments under a commercial or private annuity, an annuity trust, a unitrust, or a similar arrangement.“Transfer,” as it relates to a transfer by or of the decedent, includes (i) an exercise or release of a presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the decedent, (ii) a lapse at death of a presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the decedent, and (iii) an exercise, release, or lapse of a general power of appointment that the decedent created in himself and of a power described in subdivision 2 b of §

64.2-308.6

that the decedent conferred on a non-adverse party.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2A The Elective Share.
§ 2A.01 In Virginia
— Overview, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1104 Complaint for an Accounting Following Election Under Augmented Estate, et seq.; No. 14-101 Antenuptial Agreement, et seq.; No. 14-215. Release and Waiver of Marital Rights; No. 15-307 Waiver of Spouse’s Rights Under Augmented Estate Against Trust Assets; No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration.

§ 64.2-308.2.
Dower or curtesy abolished.

The interests of dower and curtesy are abolished. However, the abolition of dower and curtesy pursuant to this section shall not change or diminish the nature or right of (i) any dower or curtesy interest of a surviving spouse whose dower or curtesy vested prior to January 1, 1991, or (ii) a creditor or other interested third party in any real estate subject to a right of dower or curtesy.

The rights of all such parties, and the procedures for enforcing such rights, shall continue to be governed by the laws in force prior to January 1, 1991.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.3.
Elective share amount; effect of election on statutory benefits; non-domiciliary.

The surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state has a right of election, under the limitations and conditions stated in this article, to take an elective-share amount equal to 50 percent of the value of the marital-property portion of the augmented estate.

If the right of election is exercised by or on behalf of the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse’s homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance, if any, are not charged against but are in addition to the elective-share amount.

The right, if any, of the surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled outside this state to take an elective share in property in this state is governed by the law of the decedent’s domicile at death.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-447 Claim for Elective Share of Augmented Estate, et seq.

§ 64.2-308.4.
Composition of the augmented estate; marital property portion.

Subject to §

64.2-308.9

, the value of the augmented estate, to the extent provided in §§

64.2-308.5

,

64.2-308.6

,

64.2-308.7

, and

64.2-308.8

, consists of the sum of the values of all property, whether real or personal, movable or immovable, tangible or intangible, wherever situated, that constitute:

The decedent’s net probate estate;

The decedent’s non-probate transfers to others;

The decedent’s non-probate transfers to the surviving spouse; and

The surviving spouse’s property and non-probate transfers to others.

The value of the marital-property portion of the augmented estate consists of the sum of the values of the four components of the augmented estate as determined under subsection A multiplied by the following percentage:If the decedent and the spouse were married to each other: The percentage is:

Less than 1 year
3%1 year but less than 2 years
6%2 years but less than 3 years
12% 3 years but less than 4 years
18%4 years but less than 5 years
24%5 years but less than 6 years
30%6 years but less than 7 years
36%7 years but less than 8 years
42%8 years but less than 9 years
48%9 years but less than 10 years
54%10 years but less than 11 years
60%1 years but less than 12 years
68%12 years but less than 13 years
76%13 years but less than 14 years
84%14 years but less than 15 years
92%15 years or more
100%

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.5.
Decedent’s net probate estate.

The value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent’s probate estate, reduced by funeral and administration expenses (excluding federal or state transfer taxes), homestead allowance, family allowances, exempt property, and enforceable claims.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.6.
Decedent’s non-probate transfers to others.

The value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others, not included under §

64.2-308.5

, of any of the following types, in the amount provided respectively for each type of transfer:

Property owned or owned in substance by the decedent immediately before death that passed outside probate at the decedent’s death. Property included under this category consists of:

Property over which the decedent, alone, immediately before death, held a presently exercisable general power of appointment. The amount included is the value of the property subject to the power, to the extent the property passed at the decedent’s death, by exercise, release, lapse, in default, or otherwise, to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse.

The decedent’s fractional interest in property held by the decedent in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship. The amount included is the value of the decedent’s fractional interest, to the extent the fractional interest passed by right of survivorship at the decedent’s death to a surviving joint tenant other than the decedent’s surviving spouse.

The decedent’s ownership interest in property or accounts held in Payable on Death or Transfer on Death designations or co-ownership registration with the right of survivorship. The amount included is the value of the decedent’s ownership interest, to the extent the decedent’s ownership interest passed at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse.

Proceeds of insurance, including accidental death benefits, on the life of the decedent, if the decedent owned the insurance policy immediately before death or if and to the extent the decedent alone and immediately before death held a presently exercisable general power of appointment over the policy or its proceeds. The amount included is the value of the proceeds, to the extent they were payable at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse.

Property transferred in any of the following forms by the decedent during marriage:

Property that passed during marriage and during the two-year period next preceding the decedent’s death as a result of a transfer by the decedent if the transfer was of any of the following types:

a.

Any irrevocable transfer in which the decedent retained the right to the possession or enjoyment of, or to the income from, the property if and to the extent the decedent’s right terminated at or continued beyond the decedent’s death. The amount included is the value of the fraction of the property to which the decedent’s right related, to the extent the fraction of the property passed outside probate to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse.

b.

Any transfer in which the decedent created a power over income or property, exercisable by the decedent alone or in conjunction with any other person, or exercisable by a non-adverse party, to or for the benefit of the decedent, creditors of the decedent, the decedent’s estate, or creditors of the decedent’s estate. The amount included with respect to a power over property is the value of the property subject to the power, and the amount included with respect to a power over income is the value of the property that produces or produced the income, to the extent the power in either case was exercisable at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent’s surviving spouse or to the extent the property passed at the decedent’s death, by exercise, release, lapse, in default, or otherwise, to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse. If the power is a power over both income and property and the preceding sentence produces different amounts, the amount included is the greater amount.

a.

Any property that passed as a result of the termination of a right or interest in, or power over, property that would have been included in the augmented estate under subdivision 1 a, b, or c, or under subdivision 2, if the right, interest, or power had not terminated until the decedent’s death. The amount included is the value of the property that would have been included under those subdivisions if the property were valued at the time the right, interest, or power terminated, and is included only to the extent the property passed upon termination to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent or the decedent’s estate, spouse, or surviving spouse. As used in this subdivision, “termination,” with respect to a right or interest in property, occurs when the right or interest terminated by the terms of the governing instrument or the decedent transferred or relinquished the right or interest, and, with respect to a power over property, occurs when the power terminated by exercise, release, lapse, default, or otherwise, but, with respect to a power described in subdivision 1 a, “termination” occurs when the power terminated by exercise or release, but not otherwise.

b.

Any transfer of or relating to an insurance policy on the life of the decedent if the proceeds would have been included in the augmented estate under subdivision 1 d had the transfer not occurred. The amount included is the value of the insurance proceeds to the extent the proceeds were payable at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of any person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse.

c.

Any transfer of property, to the extent not otherwise included in the augmented estate, made to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s surviving spouse. The amount included is the value of the transferred property to the extent the transfers to any one donee in either of the two years next preceding the date of the decedent’s death exceeded the amount excludable from taxable gifts under 26 U.S.C. § 2503(b), or its successor, on the date of the gift.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1105 Petition for Contribution to Augmented Estate; No. 16-1408 Release of Marital Rights by Non-Owning Spouse.

§ 64.2-308.7.
Decedent’s non-probate transfers to the surviving spouse.

Excluding property passing to the surviving spouse under the federal social security system, the value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to the decedent’s surviving spouse, which consist of all property that passed outside probate at the decedent’s death from the decedent to the surviving spouse by reason of the decedent’s death, including:

The decedent’s fractional interest in property held as a joint tenant with the right of survivorship, to the extent that the decedent’s fractional interest passed to the surviving spouse as surviving joint tenant;

The decedent’s ownership interest in property or accounts held in co-ownership registration with the right of survivorship, or with Payable on Death or Transfer on Death designations to the extent the decedent’s ownership interest passed to the surviving spouse as surviving co-owner; and

All other property that would have been included in the augmented estate under subdivision 1 or 2 of §

64.2-308.6

had it passed to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s spouse, surviving spouse, the decedent, or the decedent’s creditors, estate, or estate creditors.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.8.
Surviving spouse’s property and non-probate transfers to others.

Except to the extent included in the augmented estate under §

64.2-308.5

or

64.2-308.7

, the value of the augmented estate includes the value of:

Property that was owned by the decedent’s surviving spouse at the decedent’s death, including:

The surviving spouse’s fractional interest in property held in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship;

The surviving spouse’s ownership interest in property or accounts held in co-ownership registration with the right of survivorship; and

Property that passed to the surviving spouse by reason of the decedent’s death, but not including the spouse’s right to homestead allowance, family allowance, exempt property, or payments under the federal social security system.

Property included under this section is valued at the decedent’s death, taking the fact that the decedent predeceased the spouse into account, but, for purposes of subdivision A 1 a or b, the values of the spouse’s fractional and ownership interests are determined immediately before the decedent’s death if the decedent was then a joint tenant or a co-owner of the property or accounts. For purposes of subdivision A 2, proceeds of insurance that would have been included in the spouse’s non-probate transfers to others under subdivision 1 d of §

64.2-308.6

are not valued as if the spouse were deceased.

The value of property included under this section is reduced by enforceable claims against the surviving spouse.

2.

Property that would have been included in the surviving spouse’s non-probate transfers to others, other than the spouse’s fractional and ownership interests included under subdivision 1 a or b, had the spouse been the decedent.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.9.
Exclusions, valuation, and overlapping application.

The value of any property is excluded from the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others:

To the extent that the decedent received adequate and full consideration in money or money’s worth for a transfer of the property; or

If the property was transferred with the written joinder of, or if the transfer was consented to in writing before or after the transfer by, the surviving spouse.

The value of any property otherwise included under §

64.2-308.5

,

64.2-308.6

, or

64.2-308.7

, and its income or proceeds, is excluded from the decedent’s net probate estate, decedent’s non-probate transfers to others, and decedent’s non-probate transfers to the surviving spouse to the extent that such property was transferred to or for the benefit of the decedent, before or during the marriage to the surviving spouse, by gift, will, transfer in trust, intestate succession, or any other method or form of transfer to the extent that it was (i) transferred without full consideration in money or money’s worth from a person other than the surviving spouse and (ii) maintained by the decedent as separate property.
B. 1. The value of any property otherwise included under §

64.2-308.5

,

64.2-308.6

, or

64.2-308.7

, and its income or proceeds, is excluded from the decedent’s net probate estate, decedent’s non-probate transfers to others, and decedent’s non-probate transfers to the surviving spouse to the extent that such property was transferred to or for the benefit of the decedent, before or during the marriage to the surviving spouse, by gift, will, transfer in trust, intestate succession, or any other method or form of transfer to the extent that it was (i) transferred without full consideration in money or money’s worth from a person other than the surviving spouse and (ii) maintained by the decedent as separate property.

The value of any property otherwise included under §

64.2-308.8

, and its income or proceeds, is excluded from the surviving spouse’s property and non-probate transfers to others to the extent that such property was transferred to or for the benefit of the surviving spouse, before or during the marriage to the decedent, by gift, will, transfer in trust, intestate succession, or any other method or form of transfer to the extent that it was (i) transferred without full consideration in money or money’s worth from a person other than the decedent and (ii) maintained by the surviving spouse as separate property.

The value of property:

Included in the augmented estate under §

64.2-308.5

,

64.2-308.6

,

64.2-308.7

, or

64.2-308.8

is reduced in each category by enforceable claims against the included property; and

Includes the commuted value of any present or future interest and the commuted value of amounts payable under any trust, life insurance settlement option, annuity contract, public or private pension, disability compensation, death benefit or retirement plan, or any similar arrangement, exclusive of the federal social security system. Except as provided herein for interests passing to a surviving spouse, life estates and remainder interests are valued in the manner prescribed in Chapter 5 (§

55.1-500

et seq.) of Title 55.1 and deferred payments and estates for years are discounted to present value using the interest rate specified in §

55.1-500

. In valuing partial and contingent interests passing to the surviving spouse, and beneficial interests in trust, the following special rules apply:

The value of the beneficial interest of a spouse shall be the entire fair market value of any property held in trust if the decedent was the settlor of the trust, if the trust is held for the exclusive benefit of the surviving spouse during the surviving spouse’s lifetime, and if the terms of the trust meet the following requirements:

During the lifetime of the surviving spouse, the trust is controlled by the surviving spouse or one or more trustees who are non-adverse parties;

The trustee shall distribute to or for the benefit of the surviving spouse the entire net income of the trust at least annually;

The trustee is permitted to distribute to or for the benefit of the surviving spouse out of the principal of the trust such amounts and at such times as the trustee, in its discretion, determines for the health, maintenance, and support of the surviving spouse; and

In exercising discretion, the trustee may be authorized or required to take into consideration all other income assets and other means of support available to the surviving spouse.

To the extent that the partial or contingent interest is dependent upon the occurrence of any contingency that is not subject to the control of the surviving spouse and that is not subject to valuation by reference to the mortality and annuity tables set forth in §§

55.1-501

through

55.1-506

, the contingency will be conclusively presumed to result in the lowest possible value passing to the surviving spouse.

To the extent that the valuation of a partial or contingent interest is dependent upon the life expectancy of the surviving spouse, that life expectancy shall be conclusively presumed to be no less than 10 years, regardless of the actual attained age of the surviving spouse at the decedent’s death.

In case of overlapping application to the same property of the subsections or subdivisions of §

64.2-308.6

,

64.2-308.7

, or

64.2-308.8

, the property is included in the augmented estate under the provision yielding the greatest value, and under only one overlapping provision if they all yield the same value.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269; 2018, c. 301.

Editor’s note.

As enacted by Acts 2016, cc. 187 and 269, this section contained two subdivision C 1 designations. The first subdivision was redesignated as subsection C at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Chapter 5 (§

55.1-500

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Article 2 (§ 55-269.1 et seq.) of Chapter 15 of Title 55,” “55.1-500” for “55-269.1” and “55.1-501 through

55.1-506

” for “55-271 through 55-277.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 301 inserted “that” following “extent” throughout subsections A and B; in subdivision B 1, inserted “or

64.2-308.7

” and “and decedent’s non-probate transfers to the surviving spouse”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2018).

§ 64.2-308.10.
Sources from which elective share payable.

In a proceeding for an elective share, the following are applied first to satisfy the elective-share amount and to reduce or eliminate any contributions due from the decedent’s probate estate and recipients of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others:

Amounts excluded from the augmented estate under subdivision B 1 of §

64.2-308.9

that passed to the surviving spouse and amounts that passed to the surviving spouse at the decedent’s death pursuant to the decedent’s exercise of a power of appointment over property not included in the augmented estate;

Amounts included in the augmented estate under §

64.2-308.5

that pass or have passed to the surviving spouse by testate or intestate succession and amounts included in the augmented estate under §

64.2-308.7

; and

The marital property portion of amounts included in the augmented estate under §

64.2-308.8

.

The marital property portion under subdivision A 3 is computed by multiplying the value of the amounts included in the augmented estate under §

64.2-308.8

by the percentage of the augmented estate set forth in the schedule in subsection B of §

64.2-308.4

appropriate to the length of time the spouse and the decedent were married to each other.

If, after the application of subsection A, the elective share amount is not fully satisfied, amounts included in the decedent’s net probate estate, other than assets passing to the surviving spouse by testate or intestate succession, and in the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others under subdivisions 1, 2, and 3 b of §

64.2-308.6

are applied first to satisfy the unsatisfied balance of the elective share amount. The decedent’s net probate estate and that portion of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others are so applied that liability for the unsatisfied balance of the elective share amount is apportioned among the recipients of the decedent’s net probate estate and of that portion of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others in proportion to the value of their interests therein.

If, after the application of subsections A and C, the elective share amount is not fully satisfied, the remaining portion of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others is so applied that liability for the unsatisfied balance of the elective share amount is apportioned among the recipients of the remaining portion of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others in proportion to the value of their interests therein.

The unsatisfied balance of the elective share amount as determined under subsection C or D is treated as a general pecuniary bequest.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269; 2018, c. 301.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 301 rewrote subdivision A 1, which read “The value of property excluded from the augmented estate under subsection A of §

64.2-308.9

, which passes or has passed to the surviving spouse.”

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2018).

§ 64.2-308.11.
Personal liability of recipients.

Only original recipients of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others, and the donees of the recipients of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others, to the extent the donees have the property or its proceeds, are liable to make a proportional contribution toward satisfaction of the surviving spouse’s elective share amount. A person liable to make contribution may choose to give up the proportional part of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to him or to pay the value of the amount for which he is liable in cash, or, upon agreement of the surviving spouse, other property.

If any section or part of any section of this article is preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or any other benefit included in the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others, a person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of property, or any other benefit is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of that item of property or benefit, as provided in §

64.2-308.10

, to the person who would have been entitled to it were that section or part of that section not preempted.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.12.
Proceeding for elective share; time limit.

The election by the surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled in the Commonwealth must be made no later than six months after the later of (i) the time of the admission of the decedent’s will to probate or (ii) the qualification of an administrator on the decedent’s intestate estate, by a writing recorded in the court or the clerk’s office thereof, upon such acknowledgment or proof as would authorize a writing to be admitted to record under Chapter 6 (§

55.1-600

et seq.) of Title 55.1. The clerk shall record such election in the will book of the court. A copy of such election shall be provided to the personal representative, if any, by regular U.S. mail or hand delivery within 30 days of filing.

The surviving spouse must file the complaint to determine the elective share no later than six months after the filing of the election as set forth in subsection A. No later than 30 days after the filing of the complaint, the surviving spouse must provide a copy of the complaint to all known persons interested in the estate and to the distributees and recipients of portions of the augmented estate whose interests will be adversely affected by the taking of the elective share. The decedent’s non-probate transfers to others are not included within the augmented estate for the purpose of computing the elective share if the complaint is filed more than 12 months after the decedent’s death.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

8.01-380

, the election for an elective share may be withdrawn by the surviving spouse at any time before entry of a final determination by the court and such election shall be extinguished.

After notice and hearing, the court shall determine the elective share amount, and shall order its payment from the assets of the augmented estate or by contribution as appears appropriate under §§

64.2-308.10

and

64.2-308.11

. If it appears that a fund or property included in the augmented estate has not come into the possession of the personal representative, or has been distributed by the personal representative, the court nevertheless shall fix the liability of any person who has any interest in the fund or property or who has possession thereof, whether as trustee or otherwise. The proceeding may be maintained against fewer than all persons against whom relief could be sought, but no person is subject to contribution in any greater amount than such person would have been under §§

64.2-308.10

and

64.2-308.11

had relief been secured against all persons subject to contribution.

An order or judgment of the court may be enforced as necessary in suit for contribution or payment in other courts of this state or other jurisdictions.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Chapter 6 (§

55.1-600

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 6 (§ 55-106 et seq.) of Title 55.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-1104 Complaint for an Accounting Following Election Under Augmented Estate; No. 15-447 Claim for Elective Share of Augmented Estate.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Abandonment not shown. —

Wife was not barred from any interest in the husband’s estate, as her conduct did not evidence an intent to abandon the marital relationship; although the frequency of her visits to the husband may have varied after she moved out of their granddaughter’s home, the wife continued to visit the husband until his death, they maintained a joint banking account until then, and the wife and her neighbor did not have an extramarital relationship but were merely good friends. Thompson v. Thompson, 103 Va. Cir. 170, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 461 (Nelson County Sept. 30, 2019).

§ 64.2-308.13.
Right of election personal to surviving spouse; incapacitated surviving spouse.

The right of election may be exercised only by or on behalf of a surviving spouse who is living when the election for the elective share is filed in the court under subsection A of §

64.2-308.12

. If the election is not made by the surviving spouse personally, it may be made on the surviving spouse’s behalf by his or her conservator or agent under the authority of a durable power of attorney.

If the election is made on behalf of a surviving spouse who is an incapacitated person, and the court enters an order determining the amounts due to the surviving spouse, the court must set aside that portion of the elective share amount due from the decedent’s probate estate and recipients of the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others under subsections C and D of §

64.2-308.10

and must appoint a trustee to administer that property for the support of the surviving spouse. For the purposes of this subsection, an election on behalf of a surviving spouse by a conservator or agent under a durable power of attorney is presumed to be on behalf of a surviving spouse who is an incapacitated person. The trustee must administer the trust in accordance with the following terms or such other terms as the court determines appropriate:

Expenditures of income and principal may be made in the manner, when, and to the extent that the trustee determines suitable and proper for the surviving spouse’s support, without court order but with regard to other support, income, and property of the surviving spouse and benefits of medical or other forms of assistance from any state or federal government or governmental agency for which the surviving spouse must qualify on the basis of need.

During the surviving spouse’s incapacity, neither the surviving spouse nor anyone acting on behalf of the surviving spouse has a power to terminate the trust; but if the surviving spouse regains capacity, the surviving spouse then acquires the power to terminate the trust and acquire full ownership of the trust property free of trust, by delivering to the trustee a writing signed by the surviving spouse declaring the termination.

Upon the surviving spouse’s death, the trustee shall transfer the unexpended trust property in the following order: (i) under the residuary clause, if any, of the will of the predeceased spouse against whom the elective share was taken, as if that predeceased spouse died immediately after the surviving spouse; or (ii) to the predeceased spouse’s heirs under Chapter 2 (§

64.2-200

et seq.).

The trust shall be treated as a testamentary trust subject to the provisions governing testamentary trustees under Title 64.2.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Incapacity not shown. —

Wife was not an incapacitated person and the appointment of a trustee under the statute was not necessary; while the wife had vision and hearing difficulties, her testimony was lucid, she understood the nature of the proceedings, and she recognized family members and was able to recall specific past events. Thompson v. Thompson, 103 Va. Cir. 170, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 461 (Nelson County Sept. 30, 2019).

§ 64.2-308.14.
Waiver of right to elect and of other rights; defenses.

The right of election of a surviving spouse and the rights of the surviving spouse to homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance, or any of them, may be waived, wholly or partially, before or after marriage, by a written contract, agreement, or waiver signed by the surviving spouse.

A surviving spouse’s waiver is not enforceable if the surviving spouse proves that:

The waiver was not executed voluntarily; or

The waiver was unconscionable when it was executed and before execution of the waiver because:

A fair and reasonable disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the decedent was not provided;

Any right to disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the decedent beyond the disclosure provided was not voluntarily and expressly waived, in writing; and

The surviving spouse did not have, or reasonably could not have had, an adequate knowledge of the property or financial obligations of the decedent.

An issue of unconscionability of a waiver is for decision by the court as a matter of law.

Unless it provides to the contrary, a waiver of all rights, or equivalent language, in the property or estate of a present or prospective spouse or a complete property settlement entered into after or in anticipation of separation or divorce is a waiver of all rights of elective share, homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance by each spouse in the property of the other and a renunciation by each of all benefits that would otherwise pass to one spouse from the other by intestate succession or by virtue of any will executed before the waiver or property settlement.

If a spouse willfully deserts or abandons the other spouse and such desertion or abandonment continues until the death of the other spouse, the party who deserted or abandoned the deceased spouse shall be barred of all interest in the decedent’s estate by intestate succession, elective share, exempt property, family allowance, and homestead allowance.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Appointment of trustee. —

Wife was not an incapacitated person and the appointment of a trustee under the statute was not necessary; while the wife had vision and hearing difficulties, her testimony was lucid, she understood the nature of the proceedings, and she recognized family members and was able to recall specific past events. Thompson v. Thompson, 103 Va. Cir. 170, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 461 (Nelson County Sept. 30, 2019).

Abandonment not shown. —

Wife was not barred from any interest in the husband’s estate, as her conduct did not evidence an intent to abandon the marital relationship; although the frequency of her visits to the husband may have varied after she moved out of their granddaughter’s home, the wife continued to visit the husband until his death, they maintained a joint banking account until then, and the wife and her neighbor did not have an extramarital relationship but were merely good friends. Thompson v. Thompson, 103 Va. Cir. 170, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 461 (Nelson County Sept. 30, 2019).

Waiver. —

Wife waived her right to claim an elective share because the prenuptial agreement specifically stated that each party waived any and all rights of every kind, nature, and description as spouse or surviving spouse; the wife’s motion for an extension of time to file for the elective share was denied on the grounds that she waived her claim, pursuant to the terms and conditions of the prenuptial agreement. Algabi v. Dagvadorj, 106 Va. Cir. 153, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 193 (Loudoun County Oct. 19, 2020).